hu: Alapvető jellemzők: Reteszelő mechanizmus forgással; Csúszásmentes gumitalp; Szívótalp; Egyéb
sl-SI: Funkcije podlage: Zaklepanje vrtenja; Nedrseče gumijaste nogice; Sesalna osnova; Druga
fr: Caractéristiques de la base: Rotation de verrouillage; Pieds en caoutchouc antidérapants; Base aspirante; Autre
ja: ベースの機能: 回転ロック; 滑り止め付きゴム脚; 吸盤ベース; その他
ru: Характеристики основания: Блокировка вращения; Нескользящие резиновые ножки; Основание на присоске; Другое
en: Base features: Locking rotation; Non-slip rubber feet; Suction base; Other
pt-PT: Características da base: Rotação de bloqueio; Pés de borracha antiderrapantes; Base de sucção; Outro
de: Basiseigenschaften: Arretierung der Drehung; Rutschfeste Gummifüße; Saugfuß; Sonstiges
nb: Basisfunksjoner: Låsende rotasjon; Sklisikre gummiføtter; Sugekopp; Annet
bg-BG: Характеристики на базата: Въртящо заключване; Нехлъзгащи се гумени крачета; Вакуумна основа; Друго
nl: Functies van de basis: Vergrendelende rotatie; Antislip rubberen voetjes; Zuignapvoet; Overig
el: Χαρακτηριστικά βάσης: Κλείδωμα περιστροφής; Αντιολισθητικά πόδια από καουτσούκ; Βάση με βεντούζα; Άλλο
zh-TW: 底座功能: 鎖定旋轉; 防滑橡膠腳墊; 吸盤底座; 其他
it: Caratteristiche della base: Rotazione di bloccaggio; Piedini in gomma antiscivolo; Base a ventosa; Altro
pt-BR: Características da base: Rotação de travamento; Pés de borracha antiderrapantes; Base de sucção; Outro
tr: Temel özellikler: Kilitli dönüş; Kaymaz kauçuk ayaklar; Vantuzlu taban; Diğer
ko: 베이스 특징: 회전 잠금; 미끄럼 방지 고무 발; 흡착식 바닥; 기타
ro-RO: Caracteristici de bază: Rotație cu blocare; Picioare din cauciuc antiderapant; Bază cu sucțiune; Altele
vi: Đặc điểm chân đế: Khóa xoay; Chân cao su chống trượt; Đế hút; Khác
cs: Vlastnosti podstavce: Zámek otáčení; Protiskluzové gumové nožičky; Přísavná základna; Jiné
hr-HR: Značajke baze: Rotacija s blokadom; Neklizajuće gumene nožice; Vakuumska baza; Ostalo
da: Grundlæggende funktioner: Låsende rotation; Skridsikre gummifødder; Sugebase; Andet
pl: Funkcje podstawy: Blokada obrotu; Antypoślizgowe gumowe nóżki; Z przyssawką; Pozostałe
th: คุณสมบัติของฐาน: ฐานหมุนแบบล็อกได้; ฐานยางกันลื่น; ฐานดูดสุญญากาศ; อื่นๆ
lt-LT: Pagrindo savybės: Fiksuojamas sukimasis; Neslystančios guminės kojelės; Siurbimo pagrindas; Kita
sv: Basfunktioner: Låsbar rotation; Halkfria gummifötter; Sugproppsfot; Övrigt
fi: Alustan ominaisuudet: Lukituskierto; Liukumattomat kumijalat; Imuletku; Muu
sk-SK: Vlastnosti základne: Zablokovanie rotácie; Protišmykové gumené nožičky; Prísavná základňa; Iné
zh-CN: 底座特性: 锁定旋转; 防滑橡胶脚垫; 吸盘底座; 其他
es: Características de la base: Bloqueo de rotación; Patas de goma antideslizantes; Base de succión; Otros